Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-6206
Certificate or
certification, defined.

Certificate or certification
shall mean a voluntary process by which a statutory regulatory entity grants
recognition to an individual who has met certain prerequisite qualifications
specified by such regulatory entity and who may assume or use certified in
the title or designation to perform prescribed tasks.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 7.
July 19, 2012